Utah statutes.
65A-8-301.   Legislative finding and purpose.
(1)  The Legislature finds the health and welfare of the people of the state
require the preservation of certain rare, or threatened, or vanishing species
of trees to preserve the state's scenic beauty and preserve its historic past
as it relates to such trees.
(2)  It is the intent of this part to retain as many heritage trees as
possible consistent with the reasonable and economic enjoyment of private
property.
